csv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_CNJ_d.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagasininiigwen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagasinoogwen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagasinoogwen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagasinoogwen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagadinigwen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagadogwen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagadinigwen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagadogwen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagasininigobanen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagasinoogobanen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagasininigobanen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagasinoogobanen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagadinigobanen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagadogobanen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagadinigobanen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagadogobanen
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagasininig
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagasinog
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagasininig
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagasinog
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagadinig
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagak
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagadinig
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagak
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagasininigiban
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagasinoogiban
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagasininigiban
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagasinoogiban
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: zanagadinigiban
     zanagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: zanagakiban
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atemagadinigiban
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atemagakiban
